New York, session 2025-2026, A4166.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1, 2, 3 and 4 of section 917 of the education 2 law, as amended by chapter 61 of the laws of 2002, are amended to read 3 as follows: 4 1. School districts, boards of cooperative educational services, coun- 5 ty vocational education and extension boards and charter schools shall 6 provide and maintain on-site in each instructional school facility auto- 7 mated external defibrillator (AED) equipment, as defined in paragraph 8 (a) of subdivision one of section three thousand-b of the public health 9 law, in quantities and types deemed by the commissioner in consultation 10 with the commissioner of health to be adequate to ensure ready and 11 appropriate access for use during emergencies, provided however, and 12 such AED shall be immediately available in and at all school sponsored 13 events including to athletic coaching and/or training staff at the 14 location of any school-sponsored practice or athletic event. 15 2. School districts, boards of cooperative educational services, coun- 16 ty vocational education and extension boards and charter schools shall 17 develop and implement a cardiac emergency response plan that addresses 18 the appropriate use of personnel to respond to incidents involving any 19 individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threat- 20 ening emergency on any school site owned or operated by a school or at a 21 location of any practice or athletic event. Such cardiac emergency 22 response plan shall include the training of appropriate personnel 23 including but not limited to school personnel, coaches, school nurses 24 and athletic trainers. The cardiac emergency response plan shall inte- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07949-01-5 A. 4166 2 1 grate evidenced based core elements as recommended by the American Heart 2 Association or other nationally recognized organization that provides 3 the guidelines training for the use of an automated external defibrilla- 4 tor (AED) and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and shall include 5 provisions consistent with requirements of a public access defibrilla- 6 tion provider pursuant to section three thousand-a and three thousand-b 7 of the public health law. 8 3. Whenever public school facilities pursuant to subdivision one of 9 this section are used for school sponsored or school approved curricular 10 or extracurricular events or activities and whenever a school-sponsored 11 athletic contest is held at any location, the public school officials 12 and administrators responsible for such school facility or athletic 13 contest shall ensure the presence of at least one staff person who is 14 trained, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision three of section three 15 thousand-b of the public health law, in the operation and use of an AED. 16 Where a school-sponsored [competitive] practice or athletic event is 17 held at a site other than a public school facility, the public school 18 officials shall assure that automated external defibrillator equipment 19 is provided on-site at the practice or athletic event and immediately 20 available to athletic coaching and/or training staff. 21 [3.] 4. Public school facilities and staff pursuant to subdivisions 22 one and two of this section shall be deemed a "public access defibrilla- 23 tion provider" as defined in paragraph (c) of subdivision one of section 24 three thousand-b of the public health law and shall be subject to the 25 requirements and limitations of such section. 26 [4.] 5. Pursuant to section three thousand-a and three thousand-b of 27 the public health law, any public access defibrillation provider, or any 28 employee or other agent of the provider who, in accordance with the 29 provisions of this section, voluntarily and without expectation of mone- 30 tary compensation renders emergency medical or first aid treatment using 31 an AED which has been made available pursuant to this section, to a 32 person who is unconscious, ill or injured, shall be liable only pursuant 33 to section three thousand-a of the public health law. 34 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 35 it shall have become a law.